Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.220

Bureaus—Approval—Certificate of authority—Time limit for commencing business.

If the director approves the application, he or she shall notify the alien bank of his or her approval and shall file certified copies of its charter, certificate, or other authorization to do business with the secretary of state and with the recording officer of the county in which the bureau is to be located. Upon such filing, the director shall issue a certificate of authority stating that the alien bank is authorized to operate a bureau in this state at the place designated in accordance with this chapter. No such certificate shall be transferable or assignable. Such certificate shall be conspicuously displayed at all times in the place of business specified therein.

A bureau of an alien bank must commence business within six months after the issuance of the director's certificate: PROVIDED, That the director for good cause shown may extend such period for an additional time not to exceed three months.

[ 1994 c 92 s 94; 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 22. Formerly RCW 30.42.220.]